Florida, session 2026, SB1496.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 111 112 Section 1.â(1)âThe Department of State may partner with 113 the county commissions of Orange, St. Johns, and Miami-Dade 114 Counties and each local entity designated by the commissions to 115 design, construct, operate, and manage Florida Museums of 116 History in Orange, St. Johns, and Miami-Dade Counties. Once 117 constructed, each Florida Museum of History must be owned, 118 managed, and operated by the local entity designated by the 119 respective county commission. 120 (2)(a)âThe Florida Museum of History Advisory Committee, a 121 committee as defined in s. 20.03, Florida Statutes, is created 122 within the Department of State to guide and assist with 123 planning, designing, and constructing each Florida Museum of 124 History. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the 125 committee shall operate in a manner consistent with s. 20.052, 126 Florida Statutes. 127 (b)âThe Florida Museum of History Advisory Committee shall 128 consist of the following members, who must have expertise in 129 Florida history, Black History, curation, architecture, and 130 museum design: 131 1.âOne member appointed by the Governor. 132 2.âOne member appointed by the President of the Senate. 133 3.âOne member appointed by the Speaker of the House of 134 Representatives. 135 4.âOne member appointed by the Secretary of the Department 136 of State. 137 5.âThe executive director of the Florida Tourism Industry 138 Marketing Corporation. 139 6.âThe chair and vice chair of the Florida Legislative 140 Black Caucus, who are not required to have expertise in Florida 141 history, Black History, curation, architecture, and museum 142 design. The chair and vice chair of the Florida Legislative 143 Black Caucus, in lieu of serving on the Florida Museum of 144 History Advisory Committee, may each appoint one person who has 145 expertise in Black History, Florida history, curation, 146 architecture, and museum design to serve on the Florida Museum 147 of History Advisory Committee. 148 (c)âThe Florida Museum of History Advisory Committee, in 149 partnership with each designated local entity, shall provide 150 guidance and direction in choosing the architects, museum 151 designers, curators, and other contractors to design, construct, 152 operate, and manage each Florida Museum of History. To that end, 153 such local entities shall: 154 1.âProcure architectural design services. 155 2.âProcure construction management services based upon the 156 final architectural designs and construction budgets. 157 3.âProvide recommendations for the operation and 158 administration of the museums. 159 4.âEnsure that each museum is operated as a hybrid model by 160 a nonprofit entity in combination with the respective county 161 commission, which may include a state agency, a local 162 governmental entity, or a college or university. 163 5.âConsider relevant operational models, including the: 164 a.âAvron B. Fogelman Sports Museum in Boca Raton. 165 b.âCharles H. Wright Museum of African American History in 166 Detroit, Michigan. 167 c.âFlorida Museum of Natural History in Gainesville. 168 d.âHarvey B. Gantt Center for African-American Arts + 169 Culture in Charlotte, North Carolina. 170 e.âJohn & Mable Ringling Museum of Art in Sarasota. 171 f.âMeek-Eaton Black Archives Research Center and Museum in 172 Tallahassee. 173 g.âMuseum of Florida History in Tallahassee. 174 h.âNational Civil Rights Museum in Memphis, Tennessee. 175 i.âPatricia & Phillip Frost Art Museum in Miami. 176 6.âDevelop a collections management policy to care for, 177 preserve, and curate the museumsâ collections, as well as 178 collections that may be loaned to the museums. 179 7.âDevelop and maintain curatorial policies and practices 180 consistent with generally accepted professional museum 181 standards, including collections management, exhibition 182 development, research, and interpretation. Qualified 183 professionals shall make curatorial decisions in accordance with 184 such standards and applicable law. Oversight by governing bodies 185 shall apply only to matters of fiscal accountability, public 186 transparency, and compliance with state requirements. Such 187 oversight shall not extend to the review, approval, or direction 188 of specific curatorial content, exhibitions, or interpretive 189 materials. 190 (d)âThe Florida Museum of History Advisory Committee shall 191 make recommendations that include educational materials relating 192 to the role of African-American participation in defending and 193 preserving this state and the United States, including the 194 contributions of the residents of Fort Mose, the Tuskegee 195 Airmen, and African-American veterans. 196 (3)(a)âEach county commission, in partnership with the 197 designated local entity, must create a Florida Museum of History 198 Board for each museum in Orange, St. Johns, and Miami-Dade 199 Counties. Each county commission, in partnership with the 200 designated local entity, shall appoint no more than 11 members 201 to the board governing that museum. Each member must have 202 experience in at least one of the following areas: 203 1.âFlorida history or Black history. 204 2.âMuseum curation. 205 3.âArchitecture. 206 4.âMuseum design. 207 5.âPhilanthropy. 208 (b)âEach Florida Museum of History Board shall appoint an 209 operating board of directors consisting of scholarly experts and 210 other key stakeholders representing community organizations to 211 provide program support for each museum. 212 (4)âEach Florida Museum of History Board, in consultation 213 with the respective county commission, shall: 214 (a)âDevelop a plan for the museum to acquire archival 215 materials and artifacts. 216 (b)âDevelop plans for permanent and temporary exhibitions 217 in consultation with colleagues from other institutions and 218 external content experts. 219 (c)âDevelop programs and educational materials, including 220 topics that support the mission of the Florida Museum of 221 History, in consultation with the Department of Education and 222 other external stakeholders. 223 (d)âProvide educational materials that complement and 224 support required history instruction provided in public schools 225 in accordance with s. 1003.42(2)(h), Florida Statutes. 226 (e)âCreate a transition plan for the museum to become 227 financially self-sufficient. 228 (5)âThe Florida Museum of History Advisory Committee, in 229 partnership with the designated local entities, the Florida 230 Tourism Marketing Corporation, and the local visitor and 231 convention bureaus, shall develop and execute a marketing plan 232 to promote each Florida Museum of History. The designated local 233 entities may collaborate with local destination marketing 234 organizations or convention and visitors bureaus. 235 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature shall provide at least $1 236 million each to the county commissions of Orange, St. Johns, and 237 Miami-Dade Counties to conduct a financial feasibility study for 238 each respective Florida Museum of History location. In each such 239 location, the financial feasibility study shall: 240 (a)âEvaluate the visitation potential, infrastructure 241 readiness, and financial sustainability of the area. 242 (b)âEvaluate each locationâs capacity to match at least 50 243 percent of funding provided by the Legislature using public, 244 philanthropic, or private sources. 245 (c)âAssess the likelihood that the location will become 246 financially self-sufficient within 3 years after the museumâs 247 opening, without additional financial support from the 248 Legislature. 249 (d)âBe used to determine the appropriate size and the 250 square footage of the museums for each respective location based 251 on tourism markets, funding capacity, funding availability, 252 operational sustainability, and ensure adequate capacity for 253 robust programming and future expansion. 254 (2)(a)âThe construction of each Florida Museum of History 255 shall be funded by both local and state appropriations. 256 (b)âThe Legislature shall appropriate no more than $75 257 million for the construction of the Florida Museums of History. 258 Each location may qualify for up to one-third of the funds 259 provided by the state. 260 (c)âEach county commission, in partnership with its 261 designated local entity, shall match at least 50 percent of 262 funding provided by the Legislature using public, philanthropic, 263 or private sources. 264 (d)âEstimates for recurring operational costs shall be 265 developed during the building design, site development, and 266 construction process. 267 (e)âIn addition to receiving funds as set forth in 268 paragraph (a), the Florida Museum of History Board shall seek to 269 raise private funds, gifts, donations, and solicit grants, to 270 augment any recurring funding received. The museum shall earn 271 revenue from general admission fees, ticketed programming and 272 events, retail partnerships, and facility rentals. An endowment 273 shall be created to support the acquisition, research, and care 274 of collections obtained from across the network of museums that 275 exist in this state. 276 Section 3.â(1)âThe Florida Museum of History is intended 277 to be a leading world-class cultural arts and history museum, 278 and must consist of: 279 (a)âAt least 10,000 square feet of exhibition space capable 280 of supporting all the functions of a leading world-class museum, 281 including collections care and storage, exhibits, programs, 282 large public events, large rental events, and a repository for 283 genealogical and archival materials with appropriate space for 284 public research. 285 (b)âAn archival and storage facility for items donated to 286 the Florida Museum of History at each location, as well as 287 historical documents and items and educational materials. 288 (2)âEach Florida Museum of History Board must ensure that 289 at least 33 percent of the museumâs exhibition space is 290 dedicated to the history of this state, including: 291 (a)âThe history and impact of tourism, including 292 attractions, historical sites, and tourist destinations such as 293 Disney World, Silver Springs, Universal Studios, and this 294 stateâs beaches. 295 (b)âThe history and presence of the United States military, 296 including military bases and installations in the state. 297 (c)âThe history and impact of agriculture on the stateâs 298 economy. 299 (d)âThe history of space exploration and the impact of the 300 National Aeronautics and Space Administration and related 301 activities on this state. 302 (3)âEach Florida Museum of History Board must consider 303 creating exhibition halls and spaces for: 304 (a)âFloridaâs African American museums. 305 (b)âFloridaâs Hispanic museums. 306 (c)âFloridaâs Jewish Holocaust museums. 307 (d)âAfrican Americans in the military. 308 (e)âAfrican Americans and women in aviation. 309 (f)âAfrican Americans and women in space. 310 (g)âThe history of slavery and the Civil Rights Movement in 311 this state and the United States. 312 (h)âAn exhibition hall of life-sized statues or a statue 313 garden of significant individuals in the history of this state 314 and the United States. 315 (i)âA library and archives of this stateâs Governors to 316 include 3D-printed life-sized statues of the Governors. 317 (j)âA Presidential Hall of Statues. 318 (k)âThe history of the Civil War in this state. 319 (l)âThe history of reconstruction in this state. 320 (m)âThe impact of Henry Morrison Flagler in this state. 321 (n)âA portrait gallery featuring portraits of historical 322 and significant individuals who have impacted Florida. 323 (o)âThe history of Black towns, cities, and settlements in 324 this state. 325 (p)âThe history of the migration of the citizens of the 326 Caribbean to this state, including Cubans, Haitians, and 327 Jamaicans. 328 (q)âA portrait gallery and archives of Black and Hispanic 329 elected officials in this state. 330 (r)âThe history of Historically Black Colleges and 331 Universities in this state, including the life of Mary McCleod 332 Bethune and Bethune Cookman University, and the United States. 333 (s)âA gallery of Black art that includes paintings, 334 posters, prints, glass works, quilts, and figurines. 335 (t)âThe history of Orange County, St. Johns County, or 336 Miami-Dade County. 337 (u)âThe history of the Town of Eatonville and author Zora 338 Neale Hurston. 339 (v)âHistorically significant and influential persons, 340 including artists, musicians, poets, and athletes, and 341 historical events, including Black History events in this state 342 and the United States. 343 (w)âThe history of Black entrepreneurs, scientists, 344 inventors and inventions in this state and the United States. 345 (x)âThe history of the Tuskegee Airmen and the history of 346 the Tuskegee Airmen in this state. 347 (y)âThe history of baseball in this state, including the 348 major leagues, the Negro Baseball League, the minor leagues, and 349 spring training. 350 (z)âThe impact of Cuban immigrants in this state. 351 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.